Maine, session 132, LD1864.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Variance petition; exemption from reasonable return variance
standard. The Maine Revised Statutes, Title 30-A, section 4353, subsection 4, paragraph
A does not apply to a petition for a variance from one or more provisions of a municipal
shoreland zoning ordinance or a municipal floodplain management ordinance that is filed
with the municipality's board of appeals established pursuant to Title 30-A, section 4353
if:
A. The petitioner demonstrates to the board of appeals that the petitioner suffered
substantial damage to a dock, pier or wharf, or a structure placed thereon, as a result of the
severe storms or flooding that occurred from January 9, 2024 to January 13, 2024;
B. The damaged dock, pier or wharf, or structure placed thereon, identified pursuant to
paragraph A is proposed to be reconstructed or replaced in kind and is a functionally water-
dependent structure or has a functionally water-dependent use; and
C. The petition is determined complete for processing by the board of appeals no later
than December 31, 2027.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.
Page 2 - 132LR2323(03)